Tennessee, session 114, HB0492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-6-106(a), is amended by deleting
subdivisions (a)(15) and (16) and substituting:
(15) Whether a parent has failed to pay court-ordered child support; and
(16) Any other factors deemed relevant by the court.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-6-106(g), is amended by deleting
the language "subdivisions (a)(1) – (15)" and substituting "subdivisions (a)(1) – (16)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-6-406(d)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) A parent's neglect or substantial nonperformance of parenting
responsibilities, including the failure to pay court-ordered child support;
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0492
001879
- 1 -